Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 1. Prenatal Blood Tests.

Secs. 18.15.010 — 18.15.050.
Infectious and contagious diseases. [Repealed, § 2 ch 63 SLA 1972.]

Secs. 18.15.060 — 18.15.110.
Physical examination of nonresident employees. [Repealed, § 1 ch 130 SLA 1976.]

Secs. 18.15.120 — 18.15.137.
Tuberculosis. [Repealed, § 12 ch 54 SLA 2005.]

Sec. 18.15.138.
Penalty. [Repealed, § 13 ch 73 SLA 1995.]

Secs. 18.15.139 — 18.15.149.
Court authorization of detention; title to and inventory of equipment allotted to private institutions; religious treatment for tuberculosis; screening of school employees; limited immunity; definitions. [Repealed, § 12 ch 54 SLA 2005.]

Sec. 18.15.150.
Taking of blood sample.

Each licensed physician and in the absence of a licensed physician each licensed graduate nurse who attends a pregnant woman for conditions relating to the pregnancy during the period of gestation or at delivery shall take, or have taken, a sample of the blood of the woman at the time of the woman’s first professional visit or within 10 days after the visit, unless the serological test is contrary to the tenets or practice of the religious creed of which the woman is an adherent.
The blood specimen shall be submitted to an approved laboratory or clinic for a standard serological test of syphilis. Any other person permitted by law to attend pregnant women but not permitted by law to take blood samples shall have a sample of blood taken by a licensed physician, or on order of a licensed physician, and shall submit the sample to an approved laboratory or clinic for a standard serological test for syphilis.

History.

(§ 1 ch 39 SLA 1949)

Cross references. —

For duty of certified midwife to comply with this section, see
AS

08.65.140

.

Sec. 18.15.160.
Test for syphilis.

For the purposes of AS

18.15.150

—

18.15.180

a standard serological test is a test for syphilis approved by the department and shall be performed in a laboratory or clinic approved by the department.
On request the laboratory test required by AS

18.15.150

—

18.15.180

shall be performed without charge at the laboratories of the department.

History.

(§ 2 ch 39 SLA 1949)

Administrative Code. —

For standard serological tests, see 7 AAC 27, art. 8.

Sec. 18.15.170.
Report of birth.

In reporting a birth and stillbirth, the physician and other person required to make the report shall state on the certificate whether a serological test for syphilis has been made upon a specimen of blood taken from the woman who bore the child and the approximate date when the specimen was taken.
A birth certificate may not state the result of the test.

History.

(§ 3 ch 39 SLA 1949)

Sec. 18.15.180.
Penalty.

A licensed physician or licensed nurse attending a pregnant woman during the period of gestation or at delivery, or a representative of a laboratory or clinic who violates AS

18.15.150

—

18.15.180

is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, is punishable by a fine of not more than $500. However, a person attending a pregnant woman during the period of gestation or at delivery, who requests the specimen in accordance with AS

18.15.150

, and whose request is refused, is not guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 4 ch 39 SLA 1949)

Administrative Code. —

For special procedures, see 7 AAC 5, art. 3.

Sec. 18.15.190.
[Renumbered as AS 18.15.900.]